Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 1. Programs and Courses of Instruction Generally.

§ 22.1-199.
Kindergarten programs suitable for certain children.

The kindergarten program in each school division shall include a program suitable for children who will reach their fifth birthday on or before September 30 of the school year. The school board’s plan for such program shall be furnished to the Board of Education and shall include the following:

A statement of purpose and objectives of the kindergarten program that reflects consideration of the different readiness and maturity levels of children in the program;

A description of the organization, scheduling and staffing of the program that reflects a responsiveness to the needs of the children of the age span to be served in the program;

Evidence that the program plan was developed by a committee that included early childhood specialists, parents, teachers and administrators;

Scheduling and an agenda of in-service activities for kindergarten teachers to ensure adequate preparation for the program;

A plan for the interface of the kindergarten program with the primary program to allow for continuous progress.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall disseminate to the school divisions information concerning the ages when children are required or eligible to attend school. Each school division shall disseminate such information to parents of such children of such ages upon or prior to enrollment of such children in the public schools of the division.

The age requirements set forth in subsection A of this section shall not affect the operation of any two-tiered, junior or other developmentally appropriate pre-kindergarten program or transitional first grade. In those school divisions implementing such programs, children whose fifth birthday occurs between October 1 and December 31 of the school year may be enrolled in kindergarten after an appropriate readiness evaluation has demonstrated that attendance in these programs will educationally benefit such children.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-218.1:1; 1978, c. 518; 1980, cc. 559, 570; 1985, c. 407; 1990, c. 792; 1991, c. 138.

Editor’s note.

Section 22-218.1:1, from which this section is derived, was amended by Acts 1980, c. 570. The change made by the 1980 amendment in § 22-218.1:1 was incorporated in this section as enacted by Acts 1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-199.1.
Programs designed to promote educational opportunities.

The General Assembly finds that Virginia educational research supports the conclusion that poor children are more at risk of educational failure than children from more affluent homes and that reduced pupil/teacher ratios and class sizes result in improved academic performance among young children; to this end, the General Assembly establishes a long-term goal of reducing pupil/teacher ratios and class sizes for grades K through three in those schools in the Commonwealth with high or moderate concentrations of at-risk students.

With such funds as are provided in the appropriation act for this purpose, there is hereby established the statewide voluntary pupil/teacher ratio and class size reduction program for the purpose of reaching the long-term goal of statewide voluntary pupil/teacher ratio and class size reductions for grades K through three in schools with high or moderate concentrations of at-risk students, consistent with the provisions provided in the appropriation act.

In order to facilitate these primary grade ratio and class size reductions, the Department shall calculate the state funding of these voluntary ratio and class size reductions based on the incremental cost of providing the lower class sizes according to the greater of the division average per-pupil cost of all divisions or the actual division per-pupil cost. Localities shall provide matching funds for these voluntary ratio and class size reductions based on the composite index of local ability to pay. School divisions shall notify the Department of their intention to implement the reduced ratios and class sizes in one or more of their qualifying schools by August 1 of each year. By March 31 of each year, school divisions shall forward data substantiating that each participating school has a complying pupil/teacher ratio.

In developing each proposed biennium budget for public education, the Board shall include funding for these ratios and class sizes. These ratios and class sizes shall be included in the annual budget for public education.

The General Assembly finds that educational technology is one of the most important components, along with highly skilled teachers, in ensuring the delivery of quality public school education throughout the Commonwealth. Therefore, the Board shall strive to incorporate technological studies within the teaching of all disciplines. Further, the General Assembly notes that educational technology can only be successful if teachers and administrators are provided adequate training and assistance. To this end, the following program is established.

With such funds as are appropriated for this purpose, the Board shall award to the several school divisions grants for expanded access to educational technology. Funding for educational technology training for instructional personnel shall be provided as set forth in the appropriation act.

Funds for improving the quality and capacity of educational technology shall also be provided as set forth in the appropriation act, including (i) funds for providing a technology resource assistant to serve every elementary school in this Commonwealth and (ii) funds to maintain the currency of career and technical education programs. Any local school board accepting funds to hire technology resource assistants or maintain currency of career and technical education programs shall commit to providing the required matching funds, based on the composite index of local ability to pay.

Each qualifying school board shall establish an individualized technology plan, which shall be approved by the Superintendent, for integrating technology into the classroom and into schoolwide instructional programs, including career and technical education programs. The first priority for funding shall be consistent with those components of the Board’s revised six-year technology plan that focus on (i) retrofitting and upgrading existing school buildings to efficiently use educational technology; (ii) providing (a) one network-ready multimedia microcomputer for each classroom, (b) a five-to-one ratio of pupils to network-ready microcomputers, (c) graphing calculators and relevant scientific probes/sensors as required by the Standards of Learning, and (d) training and professional development on available technologies and software to all levels and positions, including professional development for personnel delivering career and technical education at all levels and positions; and (iii) assisting school divisions in developing integrated voice-, video-, and data-connectivity to local, national and international resources.

This funding may be used to implement a local school division’s long-range technology plan, at the discretion of the relevant school board, if the local plan meets or exceeds the goals and standards of the Board’s revised six-year technology plan and has been approved by the Superintendent.

The Department of Education, the Department of General Services, and the Virginia Information Technologies Agency shall coordinate master contracts for the purchase by local school boards of the aforementioned educational technologies and reference materials.

A technology replacement program shall be, with such funds as may be appropriated for this purpose, implemented to replace obsolete educational hardware and software. As provided in subsection D of § 22.1-129, school boards may donate obsolete educational technology hardware and software that are being replaced. Any such donations shall be offered to other school divisions and to preschool programs in the Commonwealth or to public school students as provided in guidelines to be promulgated by the Board. Such guidelines shall include criteria for determining student eligibility and need, a reporting system for the compilation of information concerning the number and socioeconomic characteristics of recipient students, and notification of parents of the availability of such donations of obsolete educational hardware and software.

The General Assembly finds that local autonomy in making decisions on local educational needs and priorities results in effective grassroots efforts to improve education in the Commonwealth’s public schools only when coupled with sufficient state funding; to this end, the following block grant program is hereby established. With such funds as are provided in the appropriation act, the Department shall distribute block grants to localities to enable compliance with the Commonwealth’s requirements for school divisions in effect on January 1, 1995. Therefore, for the purpose of such compliance, the block grant herein established shall consist of a sum equal to the amount appropriated in the appropriation act for the covered programs, including the at-risk add-on program; dropout prevention, specifically Project YES; Project Discovery; English as a second language programs, including programs for overage, nonschooled students; Advancement Via Individual Determination (AVID); the Homework Assistance Program; programs initiated under the Virginia Guaranteed Assistance Program, except that such funds shall not be used to pay any expenses of participating students at institutions of higher education; and school/community health centers. Each school board may use any funds received through the block grant to implement the covered programs and other programs designed to save the Commonwealth’s children from educational failure.

In order to reduce pupil/teacher ratios and class sizes in elementary schools, from such funds as may be appropriated for this purpose, each school board may employ additional classroom teachers, remedial teachers, and reading specialists for each of its elementary schools over the requirements of the Standards of Quality. State and local funding for such additional classroom teachers, remedial teachers, and reading specialists shall be apportioned as provided in the appropriation act.

Pursuant to a turnaround specialist program administered by the Department, local school boards may enter into agreements with individuals to be employed as turnaround specialists to address those conditions at the school that may impede educational progress and effectiveness and academic success. Local school boards may offer such turnaround specialists or other administrative personnel incentives such as increased compensation, improved retirement benefits in accordance with Chapter 6.2 (§

51.1-617

et seq.) of Title 51.1, increased deferred compensation in accordance with §

51.1-603

, relocation expenses, bonuses, and other incentives as may be determined by the board.

The General Assembly finds that certain schools have particular difficulty hiring teachers for certain subject areas and that the need for such teachers in these schools is particularly strong. Accordingly in an effort to attract and retain high quality teachers, local school boards may offer instructional personnel serving in such schools as a member of a middle school teacher corps administered by the Department incentives such as increased compensation, improved retirement benefits in accordance with Chapter 6.2 (§

51.1-617

et seq.) of Title 51.1, increased deferred compensation in accordance with §

51.1-603

, relocation expenses, bonuses, and other incentives as may be determined by the board.

For purposes of this subsection, “middle school teacher corps” means licensed instructional personnel who are assigned to a local school division to teach in a subject matter in grades six, seven, or eight where there is a critical need, as determined by the Department. The contract between such persons and the relevant local school board shall specify that the contract is for service in the middle school teacher corps.

History.

1995, c. 852; 1996, c. 974; 1997, cc. 357, 394, 617, 686, 923; 1998, cc. 828, 901, 902; 1999, cc. 456, 680; 2000, cc. 93, 506; 2001, cc. 483, 484; 2004, c. 436; 2011, c. 216; 2020, cc. 860, 861; 2022, cc. 61, 355.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission,
“expenses of participating students at institutions of higher education” was substituted for “college expenses of participating students” in subsection D to conform to Acts 2016, c. 588.

Acts 2001, c. 483, cl. 2, provides: “That this act shall not be construed to require any local school board to rename its vocational schools or programs or to require any public or private vocational school to change its name; however, any public school having in its name the terms vocational or vocational technical or any variation of these terms and designated by a local school board to be a vocational or vocational technical school shall comply with the relevant requirements for career and technical education set forth in Title 22.1 of the Code of Virginia and the applicable regulations.”

Acts 2001, c. 483, cl. 3, provides: “That nothing contained in this act shall be construed to require expenditure of funds to realign any name with the term ‘career and technical education’ or to require any redesigning or reprinting of any logo, stationery, informational material or website. In addition, any stationery, pamphlets or other printed material referring to vocational education or some other term denoting career and technical education requiring an eventual revision of a state program or name may continue to be used in the normal course of business until consumed before being redesigned and reprinted.”

Acts 2001, c. 483, cl. 4, provides: “That, further, whenever any references are used in the Code of Virginia to vocational education or to vocational technical education or, when used to denote an education program, to vocational rehabilitation or any other state or local program name that clearly relates to career and technical education within its context, such terms shall be deemed to be subsumed by, synonymous with and included in the term ‘career and technical education.’ ”

Acts 2001, c. 483, cl. 5, provides: “That this act shall not be construed to require any additional services or changes in services in any state or local program or to require any such program to deliver different services than are required by applicable law.”

Acts 2001, c. 484, cl. 2, provides: “That school boards may use any educational technology funds provided in the appropriation act for career and technical education programs, including, but not limited to, funding allocated for (i) professional development in educational technology and (ii) purchase of software and hardware for upgrading capacity.”

Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021, except that § 22.1-289.04 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall become effective in due course.”

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendment by c. 456, in subsection B, in the third sentence, substituted “educational” for “education” preceding “technology can,”
in the sixth sentence, inserted the clause (i) designator, and inserted “and (ii) funds for implementing the Family Involvement in Technology program as established in § 22.1-212.2:3” at the end of the
sentence, and in the seventh sentence, deleted “such” preceding “technology resource” and inserted “or to implement the Family Involvement in Technology program” preceding “shall commit.”

The 1999 amendment by c. 680 substituted “which are being replaced” for “which is being replaced” in the second sentence of subdivision B 4 and added the present first paragraph of subdivision B 5.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 93, in subdivision B 4, added “or to public school students as provided in guidelines to be promulgated by the Board of Education” at the end of the third sentence, and added the last sentence.

The 2000 amendment by c. 506, in subsection A, in the second paragraph, deleted “Effective July 1, 1996, and” at the beginning and substituted “provided in the appropriation act” for “first provided during the 1994-1995 school year” at the end, in the fourth paragraph, substituted “each proposed” for “the proposed 1996-1998” near the beginning of the first sentence and substituted “These” for “Effective July 1, 1996, the” at the beginning of the second sentence; in subsection C, substituted “at-risk five-year-olds” for “five-year-olds” in the last sentence of the first paragraph and in the first sentence of the second paragraph, designated the former third and fourth sentences of the second paragraph as present paragraphs three and five, and added the fourth paragraph.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 483 substituted “career and technical education” for “vocational technology” in the second sentence of subdivision B 1, and substituted “that” for “which” in the third paragraph of subsection C.

The 2001 amendment by c. 484 divided the former first two paragraphs of subsection B into the present first through fourth paragraphs, in the third paragraph of subsection B inserted “Funds for improving the quality and capacity of educational technology shall also be provided as set forth in the appropriation act,” deleted “and” preceding “(ii),” inserted “and (iii) funds to maintain the currency of career and technical education programs,” deleted “these” following “accepting,” deleted “or to” preceding “implement,” and inserted “or maintain currency of career and technical education programs,” inserted “including career and technical education programs” in the third and fourth paragraphs; and in subdivision B 2, inserted “and thereafter,” and inserted “including professional development for personnel delivering career and technical education at all levels and positions” at the end of clause (ii) (d) thereof.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 436 added subsections F and G and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 216, in the third paragraph in subsection B, deleted clause (ii), which read: “funds for implementing the Family Involvement in Technology program as established in § 22.1-212.2:3,” redesignated former clause (iii) as clause (ii), and in the last sentence, deleted “implement the Family Involvement in Technology program” following “resource assistants.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 860 and 861, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and deleted subsection C and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 61 deleted “Reading Recovery” following “higher education” in subsection C; and made a stylistic change.

The 2022 amendment by c. 355 deleted “of Education” following “Department” and “Board” throughout (except for a new occurrence in the penultimate paragraph of subsection B); rewrote subsection B by removing provisions regarding 1994, 1996, and 1998 bienniums and fiscal year 2000, and in the penultimate paragraph, by substituting “Department of Education, the Department of General Services, and the Virginia Information Technologies Agency” for “Departments of Education, Information Technology, and General Services”; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For an article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1345 (1998).

For an article, “Technology and the Law,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1383 (1998).

For 2000 survey of Virginia law regarding children, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 939 (2000).

§ 22.1-199.2.
Standards for remediation programs established.

The Board of Education shall promulgate regulations for establishing standards for remediation programs that receive state funding, without regard to state funding designations, which shall be designed to strengthen and improve the effectiveness of such programs in increasing the scholastic achievement of students with academic deficiencies. Such standards shall require school divisions to evaluate remediation programs, annually, in terms of the pass rate on the Standards of Learning tests and the demographic and educational characteristics of students who have been identified for remediation pursuant to subsection C of § 22.1-253.13:1, or clause (ii) of subsection A of § 22.1-254, and § 22.1-254.01.

The Board shall also establish in regulations, a formula for determining the level of funding necessary to assist school divisions in providing transportation services to students required to attend remediation programs.

History.

1997, c. 466; 1998, cc. 602, 627, 902; 1999, cc. 488, 537, 552; 2000, c. 716; 2003, c. 697; 2006, cc. 41, 834; 2010, c. 61.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2000, c. 716, cl. 2 repeals cl. 2 and cl. 3 of Acts 1999, c. 537, which had directed the Board of Education to promulgate certain regulations by August 1, 1999 and others by August 1, 2000.

Acts 2000, c. 716, cl. 3 provides: “That the Board of Education shall promulgate all necessary regulations to implement the provisions of this act by August 1, 2000.”

The 1998 amendments.

The 1998 amendments by cc. 602 and 627, effective July 1, 2003, are identical, and in subsection A, in the last sentence, deleted “the number of students failing the Literacy Passport Test, any or all components, for each administration of the test” preceding “a demographic profile,” inserted “and,” and deleted “and the number of students failing the literacy tests who attend remedial summer school” following “(ESL).”

The 1998 amendment by c. 902, in subsection A, substituted “remediation” for “remedial summer school” in the first and second sentences, in the third sentence, inserted “the number of students failing any Standards of Learning assessments for grades three, five, and eight” and substituted “or the Standards of Learning assessments for grades three, five, and eight who attend remediation programs” for “who attend remedial summer school”; and in subsection B, substituted “remediation” for “remedial summer school” in the first and second sentences and substituted “1998” for “1997” at the end of the subsection.

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendments by cc. 488 and 552 are identical, and substituted “clause (ii) of subsection A” for “subsection E” in subsection A.

The 1999 amendment by c. 537, in subsection A, substituted “promulgate regulations for establishing” for “establish” in the first sentence, and substituted “school divisions to evaluate remediation programs, annually, in terms of the pass rate on the Standards of Learning tests” for “an evaluation of the remediation program offered by the school division to assess such students’ educational needs and program effectiveness” in clause (i); and deleted “beginning on December 1, 1998” at the end of subsection B.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 716, in subsection A, in the first paragraph, inserted “that receive state funding, without regard to state funding designations” in the first sentence and added the last sentence, and added the second paragraph.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 697 inserted “and any end-of-course tests required for the award of a verified unit of credit required for the student’s graduation” near the beginning, and “or end-of-course tests required for the award of a verified unit of credit required for the student’s graduation” near the end, of the third sentence of the first paragraph of subsection A.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 41 and 834 are identical, and substituted “three through eight” for “three, five, and eight” twice in the third sentence of the first paragraph in subdivision A; and added “prior to the commencement of the regular session of the General Assembly” at the end of subdivision B.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 61 rewrote the section.

Law Review.

For an article, “Technology and the Law,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1383 (1998).

§ 22.1-199.3.
Repealed by Acts 2004, c. 872, cl. 3, effective May 4, 2005.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, c. 872, cl. 3, provides: “That notwithstanding the revisions made in the first enactment, § 22.1-199.3 of the Code of Virginia is repealed if no specific appropriation has been made to the Virginia Educational Excellence Incentive Reward Program for fiscal year 2004 or fiscal year 2005.” No appropriation was made.

Former § 22.1-199.3, establishing the Virginia Educational Excellence Incentive Reward Program and Fund, was enacted by Acts 1998, c. 903.

§ 22.1-199.4.
At-Risk Student Academic Achievement Program and Fund.

From such funds as may be appropriated for such purpose and from such gifts, donations, grants, bequests, and other funds as may be received on its behalf, there is hereby established the At-Risk Student Academic Achievement Program, to be administered by the Board of Education, and a special nonreverting fund within the Department of the Treasury known as the At-Risk Student Academic Achievement Fund, hereafter referred to as the “Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller, and any moneys remaining in such Fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Interest earned on such funds shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it.The Department of the Treasury shall administer and manage the Fund, subject to the authority of the Board of Education to provide for its disbursement. The Fund shall be disbursed to award noncompetitive grants to public school divisions to implement research-based programs or programs identified as best practices that are designed to improve the academic achievement of at-risk public school students on the Standards of Learning assessments and decrease the rate of dropout among at-risk public school students.

The amount of grants and required local matching funds shall be determined as provided in the appropriation act.Funds received through this Program shall be used to supplement, not supplant, any local funds currently provided for at-risk programs within the school division.

The Board may issue guidelines governing the Program as it deems necessary and appropriate.

History.

2004, c. 456; 2016, cc. 720, 750.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 720 and 750 are identical, and in the second paragraph of subsection A, deleted the clause (i) and (ii) designations, deleted clause (iii) which read: “increase the number of such students obtaining the advanced studies diploma,” and made related changes.

§ 22.1-199.5.
After school programs for at-risk students.

A local school board may establish after school programs designed to prevent at-risk youth from engaging in illegal or gang-related activities for school aged children.

Local funds appropriated for K through 12 education may be used to support such after-school programs.

History.

2008, c. 455.

§ 22.1-199.6.
Expired.

Editor’s note.

This section was enacted by Acts 2016, c. 738 establishing the Mixed-Delivery Preschool Fund and Grant Program. It expired July 1, 2019, pursuant to Acts 2016, c. 738, cl. 3.

§ 22.1-199.7.
Community schools.

In order to remove nonacademic barriers to learning as a means to enhance student academic success in public elementary and secondary schools throughout the Commonwealth, the Department of Education shall establish an interagency task force composed of state and local agencies and entities in the areas of early childhood development, health, social services, community engagement, family engagement, higher education, communities in schools, and workforce development for the purpose of (i) developing a program for the establishment of community schools whereby public elementary and secondary schools serve as centers for the provision of such community programs and services to students and their families as may be necessary on the basis of unique needs of the student population to be served and (ii) developing and providing to the Governor, the Secretary of Education, local school boards, and other interested state, local, and private entities policy recommendations relating to the coordinated delivery of community services to students and their families and the operation of community schools throughout the Commonwealth in accordance with the Virginia Community School Framework.

The community schools program established pursuant to subsection A shall include a process by which school boards and community partnerships consisting of school boards and other community and service providers may apply to the Department of Education to designate an elementary or secondary school in the local school division as a community school. The application process shall include requirements for applicants to provide a plan for the sustainability of the community school and for the measurement of the success and effectiveness of the community school. The Department of Education shall consult with the interagency task force established pursuant to subsection A in the selection of applications and the designation of community schools.

History.

2020, c. 872.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 872, cl. 2 provides: “In implementing the provisions of this act, the Department of Education (the Department) shall adhere to its recommendations as published in the Virginia Community School Framework in October 2019, subject to any further research, development, modification of, or addition to such recommendations by the Department.”

§ 22.1-200.
Subjects taught in elementary grades.

In the elementary grades of every public school the following subjects shall be taught: Spelling, reading, writing, arithmetic, grammar, geography, health and physical education, drawing, civil government, history of the United States and history of Virginia.

Physical education shall include activities such as, but not limited to, cardiovascular, muscle building, or stretching exercises, as appropriate.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-233; 1980, c. 559; 2005, c. 350.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 350 inserted the A designation at the beginning of the first paragraph and added subsection B.

§ 22.1-200.01.
Alternatives to animal dissection.

Local school divisions shall provide students with alternatives to animal dissection techniques within the relevant public school curriculum or course. The Board of Education shall establish guidelines to be implemented by local school divisions regarding such alternative dissection techniques. Such guidelines shall address, but shall not be limited to, (i) the use of detailed models of animal anatomy and computer simulations as alternatives to dissection; (ii) notification of students and parents of the option to decline to participate in animal dissection; and (iii) such other issues as the Board deems appropriate.

History.

2004, c. 918.

§ 22.1-200.02.
Repealed by Acts 2005, c. 741, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former § 22.1-200.02, relating to certain mathematics and finance objectives, was enacted by Acts 2004, cc. 939, 955.

§ 22.1-200.03.
Economics education and financial literacy required in middle and high school grades; Board of Education to establish objectives for economic education and financial literacy; banking-at-school programs.

Instruction in the principles of the American economic system shall be required in the public middle and high schools of the Commonwealth to promote economics education and financial literacy of students and to further the development of knowledge, skills, and attitudes needed for responsible citizenship in a constitutional democracy.

The Board of Education shall develop and approve objectives for economics education and financial literacy at the middle and high school levels, that shall be required of all students, and shall provide for the systematic infusion of economic principles in the relevant Standards of Learning, and in career and technical education programs. The objectives shall include personal living and finances; personal and business money management skills; opening an account in a financial institution and judging the quality of a financial institution’s services; balancing a checkbook; completing a loan application; the implications of and differences between various employment arrangements with regard to benefits, protections, and long-term financial sustainability; the implications of an inheritance; the basics of personal insurance policies; consumer rights and responsibilities; dealing with salesmen and merchants; debt management; managing retail and credit card debt; evaluating the economic value of postsecondary studies, including the net cost of attendance, potential student loan debt, and potential earnings; state and federal tax computation; local tax assessments; computation of interest rates by various mechanisms; understanding simple contracts; and learning how to contest an incorrect bill.

To facilitate the objectives of economics education and financial literacy through practical experiences, the Department shall confer with the State Corporation Commission’s Bureau of Financial Institutions, and financial and relevant professional organizations in the development of guidelines for such literacy objectives. The guidelines shall include (i) rules and policies governing the establishment, operation, and dissolution of school banks and school credit unions; (ii) written agreements between partnering public schools and financial institutions, including the disposition of funds donated or other financial contributions provided by the partnering financial institution; and (iii) such other matters as the Department may deem appropriate.

The Board shall not be required to evaluate student achievement concerning economics education and financial literacy objectives in the Standards of Learning assessments required by § 22.1-253.13:3.

For the purposes of this section :“At -risk and disadvantaged students” means students having socioeconomic or cultural risk factors that research indicates may negatively influence academic achievement or may hinder an individual in reaching his life goals.“Employment arrangements” means full-time employment, part-time employment, independent contract work, gig work, piece work, contingent work, day labor work, freelance work, and 1099 work.“Financial institution” means a bank, savings and loan association, savings bank, or credit union authorized to conduct business in the Commonwealth.“High school” includes grades nine through 12.“Middle school” includes grades six through eight.

History.

2005, c. 741; 2017, c. 522; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 25.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2017, c. 522, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Education shall amend its objectives for economics education and financial literacy at the middle and high school levels to include the provisions required by this act by July 1, 2018.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 522, in subsection A, substituted “Instruction” for “By July 1, 2006, instruction”; in subsection B, deleted “but not be limited to” following “The objectives shall” and inserted “evaluating the economic value of postsecondary studies, including the net cost of attendance, potential student loan debt, and potential earnings”; and in subsection C, deleted “but not be limited to” following “The guidelines shall.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, c. 25, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection B, inserted “the implications of and differences between various employment arrangements with regard to benefits, protections, and long-term financial sustainability” in the second sentence of subsection B; and in subsection E, added the definition for “Employment arrangements” and made stylistic changes.

§ 22.1-200.1.
Optional education programs for kindergarten through grade five.

In lieu of §§ 22.1-277, 22.1-277.07, and 22.1-277.08, a school board may establish optional age-appropriate education programs for young students in grades kindergarten through five who require guidance, supervision, and discipline in a structured learning environment and who need to be redirected toward appropriate classroom decorum and acceptable personal behavior. The programs shall provide instructional and support services that will enable students to maintain academic achievement, attain basic skills and academic proficiencies, and otherwise benefit from a public education during the time that they may be removed from the regular classroom. The programs shall also be designed to accommodate students within the school building to which they have been assigned, facilitate the efficient transition of students between the optional education program and their regular classroom, and provide for the continuity of instruction, a nurturing environment, necessary guidance and supervision, and the participation of the student’s parents in correcting his behavior. Such programs shall be adequately staffed by licensed teachers or other persons with demonstrated qualifications to instruct and manage students with a range of academic gifts and deficiencies, disciplinary problems, and the need to develop and use appropriate social skills.

History.

2001, c. 846.

Law Review.

For article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 741 (2001).

§ 22.1-200.2.
Minimum instructional time; optional unstructured recreational time.

Local school boards shall provide (i) a minimum of 680 hours of instructional time to students in elementary school, except for students in half-day kindergarten, in the four academic disciplines of English, mathematics, science, and history and social science and (ii) a minimum of 375 hours of instructional time to students in half-day kindergarten in the four academic disciplines of English, mathematics, science, and history and social science.

Local school boards may include and the Board of Education shall accept, for elementary school, unstructured recreational time that is intended to develop teamwork, social skills, and overall physical fitness in any calculation of total instructional time or teaching hours, provided that such unstructured recreational time does not exceed 15 percent of total instructional time or teaching hours.

History.

2018, cc. 784, 785.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, cc. 784 and 785 were codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.